District of Columbia statutes.
47-4109

Construction.

(a)

For purposes of this chapter, the term “person” includes an officer or employee of a corporation or a member or employee of a partnership or association, who as an officer, employee, or member, is under a duty to perform the act in respect to which the violation occurs.

(b)

The provisions of this chapter may be construed, to the extent applicable, with reference to analogous provisions contained in sections 7201, 7202, 7203, 7204, 7205, 7206, 7212, and 7215 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved October 22, 1986 (100 Stat. 2085; 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.).

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5799